Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-2608.02
Protected consumer; removal of security freeze; request.

If a protected consumer or the representative wishes to remove a security freeze placed under section 8-2603.01 for the protected consumer, the protected consumer or the representative shall:

(1) Submit a request for the removal of the security freeze to the consumer reporting agency at the address or other point of contact and in the manner specified by the consumer reporting agency; and

(2) Provide to the consumer reporting agency:

(a) In the case of a request by the protected consumer:

(i) Proof that the sufficient proof of authority for the representative to act on behalf of the protected consumer is no longer valid; and

(ii) Sufficient proof of identification of the protected consumer; or

(b) In the case of a request by the representative:

(i) Sufficient proof of identification of the protected consumer and the representative; and

(ii) Sufficient proof of authority to act on behalf of the protected consumer.

Within thirty days after receiving a request that meets the requirements of this section, the consumer reporting agency shall remove the security freeze for the protected consumer.

Laws 2016, LB835, § 10;

Laws 2018, LB757, § 3.